Tennessee, session 114, SB1194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-120-101, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(l) The roof solar reflectance and thermal emittance requirements of the
International Energy Conservation Code, published by the International Code Council,
for low-sloped roofs do not apply in this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1194
002619
- 1 -